Massachusetts, session 194th, H2833.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary and for the
purpose of promoting the public good, the State Board of Retirement shall pay Virginia Wise,
the surviving spouse of Raymond Wise, an officer of the Bridgewater State College Police
Department retirement benefits as provided under section 94 of chapter 32 of the General Laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect as of June 29, 2004.
of 1